Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.030

Public deposit protection commission—State finance committee constitutes—Proceedings.

The Washington public deposit protection commission shall be the state finance committee. The record of the proceedings of the public deposit protection commission shall be kept in the office of the commission and a duly certified copy thereof, or any part thereof, shall be admissible in evidence in any action or proceedings in any court of this state.

[ 1983 c 66 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 66: See note following RCW 39.58.010.